Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 47.208, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Delivery required. deleted text begin Upon written request,deleted text end new text begin Within 45 days of the date full payment or performance of the loan secured by the mortgage or payment is received, as provided in a payoff statement as defined in section 507.401, paragraph (h), a mortgagee or mortgage servicer, as defined in sections 507.401, paragraph (d), and 507.401, paragraph (e), must issue and submitnew text end a good and valid satisfaction of mortgage in recordable form deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin to the county recorder or registrar of titles, as applicable. A good and valid satisfaction in recordable form mustnew text end be delivered to any party paying the full and final balance of a mortgage indebtedness that is secured by Minnesota real estate; such delivery shall be in hand or by certified mail postmarked within 45 days of the receipt of the written request to the holder of any interest of record in said mortgage and within 45 days of the payment of all sums due thereon. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 47.208, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Understated payoff statement; reliance. new text end new text begin (a) If a mortgagee or mortgage servicer determines the payoff amount provided in a payoff statement was understated, the mortgagee or mortgage servicer may send a corrected payoff statement. new text end new text begin (b) If the mortgagor or the mortgagor's authorized agent, which includes a title insurer or a title insurer's duly-appointed agent, receives and has reasonable opportunity to act on a corrected payoff statement issued under paragraph (a) before making payment, the corrected statement supersedes an earlier statement. new text end new text begin (c) A mortgagee or mortgage servicer that sends a payoff statement containing an understated payoff amount is prohibited from denying the accuracy of the payoff amount against any person that reasonably and detrimentally relies upon the understated payoff amount. new text end new text begin (d) This section does not: (1) affect the right of a mortgagee or mortgage servicer to recover any sum that the mortgagee or mortgage servicer did not include in a payoff statement from any person liable to pay the loan secured by a mortgage; or (2) limit any claim or defense that a person liable to pay the loan secured by the mortgage may have under law other than this section. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 507.41, is amended to read: 507.41 PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO DISCHARGE. When any mortgagee, mortgagee's personal representativenew text begin ,new text end or new text begin mortgagee's new text end assignee, deleted text begin upon full performance of the conditions of the mortgage, shall fail to discharge the same within ten days after being thereto requested and after tender of the mortgagee's reasonable charges therefor, thatdeleted text end new text begin after receiving full payment or performance of the loan secured by the mortgage, or payment as provided in a payoff statement, fails to discharge the mortgage within 45 days, thenew text end mortgagee deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end liable to the mortgagor, the mortgagor's heirs or assigns, for all actual damages thereby occasioned; and a claim for such damages may be asserted in an action for discharge of the mortgage. deleted text begin If the defendant be not a resident of the state, such action may be maintained upon the expiration of 60 days after the conditions of the mortgage have been performed, without such previous request or tender.deleted text end